Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-916
Drinking water and cups; duty to provide.

An adequate supply of cool, sanitary water, for drinking purposes, shall be made available for use of all employees of railroads. Sanitary containers, equipped with a faucet or other dispenser, and individual paper drinking cups shall be furnished by the railroad.

Laws 1955, c. 189, § 2, p. 537;

Laws 1969, c. 600, § 2, p. 2455;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 22.